Illinois, session 104th, SB573.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois TRUST Act is amended by changing 5Section 1 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 805/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois TRUST Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-463, eff. 8-28-17.)